Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) The Oregon Business Development Department shall  provide financial
assistance in the form of loans or grants for the purpose of  supporting broadband access,
affordability and adoption.
(2) The department may establish one or more programs  for providing financial assist-
ance under this section. For each program the department  establishes, the department shall,
by rule, establish:
(a) Criteria for applications and for  determining the eligibility of applicants and proposed
projects for a loan or grant;
(b) Criteria for the department to evaluate competitive applications and for  awarding a
loan or grant;
(c) Reporting requirements for a loan or grant recipient; and
(d) A process for identifying and protecting from disclosure, except as permitted by  state
and federal law,  information or data that are submitted to the department by an applicant
or recipient and that may  be subject to confidentiality protections provided by law or are
exempt from public records disclosure.
(3) In addition to the rules required  under subsection (2)(a) to (d) of this section, for each
program the department establishes to support broadband service infrastructure, the  de-
partment shall, by rule, establish:
(a) Criteria for determining whether a location qualifies as an underserved location  or
unserved location for the purpose of giving preference to proposed projects  that support
broadband service infrastructure to underserved locations or unserved  locations in this
state;
(b) Reporting requirements for a loan or grant recipient to identify the geographic area
and locations served or that will be served by the project;
(c) A process for providing public notice of pending applications;
(d) A  public process for interested persons to submit comments on pending applications;
and
(e) A process for challenging an application.
Enrolled House Bill 3201 (HB 3201-B) Page 1
(4)(a) The department shall comply with the provisions of  ORS chapter 183 in adopting
rules and awarding loans or grants under a program. Final orders issued under a  program
are subject to judicial review as provided in ORS chapter 183.
(b) When awarding a loan or grant under a program to support  broadband service
infrastructure, the department shall provide a notice of award. The notice of award shall  be
a final order in an  other than contested case proceeding and reviewable pursuant to ORS
183.480 with jurisdiction for judicial review conferred by ORS 183.484.
(5) The department, in consultation with the Oregon Broadband Advisory  Council and
consistent with applicable federal requirements, shall, by rule, establish goals for broadband
service speeds provided in this state to be used when establishing criteria under subsection
(3)(a) of this section.
(6) The department shall define by rule the  term “broadband service infrastructure pro-
gram” for purposes of implementing the provisions of this section.
(7) The department may adopt rules necessary  to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 1a.
(1) If the  Oregon Business Development Department establishes a program
to support broadband service infrastructure under section  1 of this 2023 Act that provides
loans or  grants using moneys from the federal Coronavirus Capital Projects Fund (42 U.S.C.
804), the following shall apply:
(a) For purposes of the broadband service infrastructure program, “underserved
location” means, based on  broadband mapping data published by the Federal Communications
Commission or the State of Oregon, a location  at which there is no service provider offering
reliable wireline broadband service at a speed of at least 100 megabits per  second for down-
loads and 20 megabits per second for uploads.
(b) To be eligible for a loan or grant under the broadband service infrastructure program,
an applicant shall demonstrate that at least 80 percent of the broadband-serviceable locations
on a  proposed broadband service infrastructure project’s service route that the proposed
broadband service infrastructure project will serve are underserved locations.
(c) The broadband service infrastructure program shall provide for a process for chal-
lenging an application that, except when applicable federal  funding requirements require
otherwise:
(A) Provides for a period of 30 days from the date that a pending  application is published,
during which time a broadband service provider may challenge, in writing, the application;
(B) Allows a broadband service provider to challenge an application on  the basis that a
location, described in the application as  an underserved location that the proposed broadband
service infrastructure will serve, is not an underserved location because:
(i) The broadband service provider provides broadband service at the requisite speeds to
the location; or
(ii)(I) The broadband service provider has  an enforceable commitment to provide
broadband service at the requisite speeds to the location; and
(II) The commitment to provide broadband services at the  requisite speeds to the lo-
cation is by a date that is earlier than  the date the proposed broadband service
infrastructure will begin to provide broadband services, as described in the application; and
(C) Allows an applicant to amend an application  in response to a decision regarding a
challenge.
(2) If the  department establishes a program to support broadband service infrastructure
under section 1 of this 2023  Act that provides loans or grants using moneys from the federal
Broadband Equity, Access, and Deployment Program established under 47  U.S.C. 1702, the
following shall apply:
(a) For purposes of the broadband service infrastructure program:
(A) “Underserved location” means, based on  broadband mapping data published by the
Federal Communications Commission or the State of Oregon, a location at which there  is
no service provider offering reliable broadband service at a speed  of at least 100 megabits per
Enrolled House Bill 3201 (HB 3201-B) Page 2
second for downloads and 20 megabits per second for uploads and with a latency equal to or
less than 100 milliseconds. “Underserved location” does not include an unserved location.
(B) “Unserved location” means, based on broadband mapping data  published by the Fed-
eral Communications Commission or the State of Oregon, a location at  which there is no
service provider offering reliable broadband  service at a speed of at least 25 megabits per
second for downloads and three megabits per second for uploads and with a  latency equal to
or less than 100 milliseconds.
(b) To be eligible for a loan or grant under the broadband service infrastructure program,
an applicant shall demonstrate that at least 80 percent of the broadband-serviceable locations
on a  proposed broadband service infrastructure project’s service route that the proposed
broadband service infrastructure project will serve are underserved locations or unserved
locations.
SECTION 2.
 Section 4, chapter 17, Oregon  Laws 2020 (first special session), as amended by
section 1, chapter 76, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 4. (1) The Broadband Fund is established, separate and distinct  from the General Fund.
Interest earned  by the Broadband Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the Broadband Fund
are continuously appropriated to  the Oregon Business Development Department to be used [ only for
providing grants  or loans through, or for administering, the Oregon Broadband Office and the program
established by  rule under section 5, chapter 17, Oregon Laws 2020 (first special session). The fund shall
consist of moneys deposited in the fund pursuant to  ORS 759.425 and moneys appropriated or trans-
ferred to the fund  by the Legislative Assembly. ] by the Oregon Broadband Office for the following
purposes:
(a) Administering the office;
(b) Carrying out the duties of the office listed in ORS 285A.166;
(c) Providing grants  or loans through the program established by rule under section 5,
chapter 17, Oregon Laws 2020 (first special session);
(d) Providing financial assistance under section 1 of this 2023 Act; and
(e) Covering the administrative costs associated with the  fund and with making grants,
loans and other distributions of moneys from the fund.
(2) The fund consists of:
(a) Moneys appropriated or transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly;
(b) Moneys transferred to the fund pursuant to ORS 759.425;
(c) Loans repaid to the fund and interest due on the loans;
(d) Amounts donated to the fund;
(e) Moneys transferred to the fund  from the federal government, state agencies or local
governments;
(f) Lottery bond proceeds allocated by the Legislative Assembly for deposit in the fund;
(g) Earnings received on moneys in the fund; and
(h) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any sources.
(3) The Broadband Fund is established to provide a flexible funding source for financing
programs and projects that  support broadband access, affordability or adoption in this state
and to support the office  in carrying out the duties of the office listed under ORS 285A.166.
Notwithstanding ORS 279A.140, the department  may enter into contracts as necessary or
appropriate to  implement programs or projects determined by the department to further
broadband access, affordability or adoption.
(4) The department may:
(a) Adopt objective criteria and  standards for the use and allocation of moneys in the
Broadband Fund.
(b) Establish accounts and subaccounts within the fund when the department  determines
that accounts or subaccounts are necessary or desirable.
SECTION 3.
 Section 4, chapter 17, Oregon  Laws 2020 (first special session), as amended by
section 1, chapter 76, Oregon Laws 2022, and section 2 of this 2023 Act, is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 3201 (HB 3201-B) Page 3
Sec. 4.  (1) The Broadband Fund is established, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
Interest earned  by the Broadband Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the Broadband Fund
are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Business  Development Department to be used by the
Oregon Broadband Office for the following purposes:
(a) Administering the office;
(b) Carrying out the duties of the office listed in ORS 285A.166;
[(c) Providing grants or loans through  the program established by rule under section 5, chapter
17, Oregon Laws 2020 (first special session); ]
[(d)] (c) Providing financial assistance under section 1 of this 2023 Act; and
[(e)] (d) Covering the administrative costs associated with the fund and with making grants,
loans and other distributions of moneys from the fund.
(2) The fund consists of:
(a) Moneys appropriated or transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly;
[(b) Moneys transferred to the fund pursuant to ORS 759.425; ]
[(c)] (b) Loans repaid to the fund and interest due on the loans;
[(d)] (c) Amounts donated to the fund;
[(e)] (d) Moneys transferred to the fund from the federal government, state agencies or local
governments;
[(f)] (e) Lottery bond proceeds allocated by the Legislative Assembly for deposit in the fund;
[(g)] (f) Earnings received on moneys in the fund; and
[(h)] (g) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any sources.
(3) The Broadband Fund is  established to provide a flexible funding source for financing pro-
grams and projects that support broadband access, affordability or adoption in this state  and to
support the office in carrying out the  duties of the office listed under ORS 285A.166.
Notwithstanding ORS 279A.140, the department may enter into contracts as  necessary or appropri-
ate to implement programs or projects determined by the department  to further broadband access,
affordability or adoption.
(4) The department may:
(a) Adopt objective criteria  and standards for the use and allocation of moneys in the Broadband
Fund.
(b) Establish accounts and subaccounts within the fund  when the department determines that
accounts or subaccounts are necessary or desirable.
SECTION 4.
 Section 5, chapter 17, Oregon Laws  2020 (first special session), is amended to read:
Sec. 5.  [ (1) As used in this section: ]
[(a) “Underserved area” means, based on the most recent broadband deployment data published
by the Federal Communications Commission, other federal agencies or the  State of Oregon, a ge-
ographic area within one or more census blocks, within which there is no  service provider offering
residential wireline or wireless broadband service at a speed of at  least 25 megabits per second for
downloads and three megabits per second for uploads. ]
[(b) “Unserved area” means, based on the most recent broadband  deployment data published by the
Federal Communications Commission, other  federal agencies or the State of Oregon, a geographic area
within one or more census blocks, within which there is no service provider offering residential wireline
or wireless broadband service at a speed of at least 10 megabits  per second for downloads and one
megabit per second for uploads. ]
[(2)(a)] (1) The Oregon  Business Development Department shall establish by rule a program for
providing grants or loans to assist eligible applicants with projects for:
[(A)] (a) The planning and development of broadband service infrastructure;
[(B)] (b) Digital literacy including cybersecurity;
[(C)] (c) Digital inclusion; and
[(D)] (d) Digital adoption.
Enrolled House Bill 3201 (HB 3201-B) Page 4
(2) The program shall be funded only by moneys transferred to the Broadband Fund es-
tablished under section 4, chapter 17, Oregon Laws 2020 (first special session),  pursuant to
ORS 759.425.
[(b)] (3) In establishing the program required by this  section, the department shall take into
consideration all federal funding opportunities for the planning and development  of broadband ser-
vice infrastructure and shall endeavor to administer the program in a manner  that serves to maxi-
mize the total available state and federal support for broadband development and related planning.
[(3) Rules adopted under this section shall include but need not be limited to rules establishing: ]
[(a) Criteria for applications and for establishing the eligibility of applicants and proposed  projects
for a grant or loan under the program; ]
[(b) A process for: ]
[(A) Identifying broadband service providers that provide service within or near the  geographic
area that would be benefited by a project proposed by an eligible applicant; and ]
[(B) Notifying the identified broadband service providers of the pending application; ]
[(c) Standards for the department to evaluate applications from eligible applicants; ]
[(d) Criteria and procedures for broadband service  providers to engage in a competitive bidding
process for contracts to complete projects pursuant to a grant or loan awarded under the program; ]
[(e) Reporting requirements by grant or loan award recipients  on the broadband service
infrastructure developed or planned for using grant or loan moneys and the locations served  or that
will be served by the broadband service infrastructure; ]
[(f) A public process for interested persons to submit comments on pending applications; ]
[(g) A process for appealing grant or loan decisions by the department; and ]
[(h) Procedures to ensure  that any records or data submitted to the department pursuant to ad-
ministration of the  program that relate to broadband, voice connections or subscriptions and that are
confidential, privileged or otherwise protected from  disclosure are not disclosed, except as permitted by
state and federal law. ]
[(4) In  making broadband service infrastructure grant or loan award decisions under the program,
the department shall apply the following preferences: ]
[(a) Regarding the geographic area that a proposed project will serve, the department shall: ]
[(A) Give first preference to proposed projects that will serve unserved areas; and ]
[(B) Give second preference to proposed projects that will serve underserved areas. ]
[(b) Regarding the customers that a proposed project will serve, the department shall: ]
[(A) Give first preference to proposed projects that  are eligible to receive funds from the Connecting
Oregon Schools Fund established under ORS 276A.424; ]
[(B) Give second preference to proposed projects  that will provide broadband service access to
public libraries; and ]
[(C) Give third preference to proposed projects that will provide broadband service access  to resi-
dential customers. ]
[(5) The department shall, as part of the program, establish procedures for distributing grant  or
loan funds awarded for the purpose of  providing broadband access to schools. Procedures established
under this subsection shall include procedures for  transferring not more than 20 percent of the moneys
deposited in the Broadband Fund established under section 4 of this 2020 special  session Act each
biennium from the Broadband Fund to the Connecting  Oregon Schools Fund established under ORS
276A.424.]
[(6) The department may not award a grant or  loan under the program for a proposed project
to:]
[(a) Develop broadband service infrastructure  to serve residential locations that, at the time the
application for  the proposed project is received by the department, have access to terrestrial wireline
or wireless  broadband service at a speed of at least 25 megabits per second for downloads and three
megabits per second for uploads; or ]
[(b) Develop broadband service infrastructure that will serve two or fewer residential locations. ]
Enrolled House Bill 3201 (HB 3201-B) Page 5
[(7)(a) If the department awards a grant or loan for a  proposed project to develop broadband ser-
vice infrastructure that  will serve nonresidential locations that, at the time the application for the pro-
posed project was  received by the department, were served by terrestrial wireline or wireless broadband
service at a speed of at least 25 megabits per second for downloads and three megabits per  second for
uploads, the broadband service providers identified pursuant  to rules adopted under subsection (3)(b)
of this section shall be afforded  a right of first refusal to contract for the development of broadband
service infrastructure as part of the project. If a  broadband service provider exercises the right of first
refusal, the provider shall be awarded  the contract to develop broadband service infrastructure as part
of the project, subject to the requirement that  the provider must offer access to the completed broadband
service infrastructure:]
[(A) Beginning no later than one year after the date that  the department awards the grant or loan
to develop the proposed project; ]
[(B) At demonstrated download and upload speeds  equal to or faster than the speeds indicated in
the application for the proposed project; and ]
[(C) At a cost that is equal to or less  than the cost indicated in the application for the proposed
project.]
[(b) This subsection does  not apply to a grant or loan award for a proposed project described in
subsection (4)(b) of this section. ]
SECTION 5.  Section 6, chapter 17, Oregon Laws  2020 (first special session), is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  [ (1) Not later than September 15 of each year, the  Oregon Business Development Depart-
ment shall report, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, to an interim committee of the  Legislative
Assembly related to telecommunications on the status of the Broadband  Fund established under section
4 of this 2020 special session Act. The report required by this section shall include a description of: ]
[(a) All loans and grants provided through the program adopted under  section 5 of this 2020 spe-
cial session Act; and ]
[(b) The status of the projects funded by the loans and grants. ]
[(2) In addition to the information required in  the report under subsection (1) of this section, the
report submitted on or before September 15, 2024, by the  department pursuant to this section shall in-
clude an evaluation of the continuing need for the Broadband Fund, including but not  limited to re-
commendations regarding the repeal,  by section 9 of this 2020 special session Act, of the Broadband
Fund and the program adopted under section 5 of this 2020 special session Act. ]
The Oregon Broadband Advisory  Council shall include in the biennial report required
under ORS 285A.160 an evaluation of the continuing need for  the program established by rule
under section 5, chapter 17, Oregon Laws 2020 (first special  session), including any recom-
mendations regarding  the repeal, by section 9, chapter 17, Oregon Laws 2020 (first special
session), of the program established  by rule under section 5, chapter 17, Oregon Laws 2020
(first special session).
SECTION 6.  Section 9, chapter 17, Oregon Laws  2020 (first special session), is amended to read:
Sec. 9.  (1) Sections [ 4,] 5 and 6 , chapter 17, Oregon Laws 2020 (first special session),  [of this
2020 special session Act ] are repealed on January 2, 2030.
(2) Any moneys  in the Broadband Fund established under section 4 , chapter 17, Oregon Laws
2020 (first special session),  [ of this 2020 special  session Act ] that are from the universal service
fund established under ORS 759.425 and that are unexpended and unobligated on January 2,  2030,
revert to the universal service fund established under ORS 759.425.
SECTION 7. The amendments  to section 4, chapter 17, Oregon Laws 2020 (first special
session), by section 3 of this 2023 Act become operative on January 2, 2030.
SECTION 8. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 3201 (HB 3201-B) Page 6
Passed by House March 30, 2023
Repassed by House June 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 22, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3201 (HB 3201-B) Page 7